Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
EXPORTS: FRUITS, VEGETABLES,

NUTS,
COFFEE, AND HONEY

Note

Part heading amended by L 1983, c 257, §5; L 2008, c 167, §4.

§147-21 Definitions. For the purposes
of this part, unless otherwise required by the context:

"Agricultural commodity" means
fruits, [vegetables], nuts, coffee, and raw unprocessed honey.

"Commercial exporter" means any
person who is engaged in the business of exporting fresh or processed
agricultural commodities to points outside the State.

"Department" means the department of
agriculture.

"Processed" means canned, preserved,
frozen, pickled, dried, or otherwise prepared with or without any ingredients
added thereto.

"Raw unprocessed honey" means honey
that has not been heated above one hundred twenty degrees Fahrenheit, or
filtered through a fine screen of less than one-sixty-fourth inch mesh, or
treated with diatomaceous earth, or in any other way that results in the loss
of any natural constituent of honey, such as plant pollen and enzymes.

"Style" means the kind or class of
any particular processed agricultural commodity as determined by its physical
characteristics, usually the size and shape thereof. [L 1955, c 258, §3; RL
1955, §22-21; am L 1959, c 267, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c
132, §2; HRS §147-21; am L 1983, c 257, pt of §5; am L 2008, c 167, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next